Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.380

Advertising falsely—Effect.

(1) The display or presentation by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, bearing a person's name in conjunction with the words "certified public accountant" or any abbreviation thereof shall be prima facie evidence in any action brought under this chapter that the person whose name is so displayed, caused or procured the display or presentation of the card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, and that the person is holding themself out to be a licensee, a certified public accountant, or a person holding a certificate under this chapter.

(2) The display or presentation by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, bearing a person's name in conjunction with the words certified public accountant-inactive or any abbreviation thereof is prima facie evidence in any action brought under this chapter that the person whose name is so displayed caused or procured the display or presentation of the card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, and that the person is holding themself out to be a certified public accountant-inactive under this chapter.

(3) In any action under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited by this chapter is sufficient to justify an injunction or a conviction without evidence of a general course of conduct.

[ 2024 c 13 s 12; 2001 c 294 s 20; 1986 c 295 s 17; 1983 c 234 s 20; 1949 c 226 s 37; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 8269-44.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 294: See note following RCW 18.04.015.

False advertising: Chapter 9.04 RCW.